Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1861
Enlargement or extension of area; rebuttable presumptions.

In determining whether an enlargement or extension of a natural gas service area, natural gas mains, or natural gas services is in the public interest pursuant to section 66-1860, the following shall constitute rebuttable presumptions:

(1) Any enlargement or extension by a metropolitan utilities district within a city of the metropolitan class or its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction is in the public interest;

(2) Any enlargement or extension by a jurisdictional utility within a city other than a city of the metropolitan class in which it serves natural gas on a franchise basis or its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction is in the public interest; and

(3) Any enlargement or extension by a metropolitan utilities district within its statutory boundary or within a city other than a city of the metropolitan or primary class in which it serves natural gas on a franchise basis or its extraterritorial zoning jurisdiction is in the public interest.

Any enlargement or extension by a metropolitan utilities district within the boundaries of a city of the metropolitan class involving the exercise of the power of eminent domain pursuant to subsection (2) of section 14-2116 shall, by reason of such exercise, be conclusively determined to be in the public interest.

Laws 1999, LB 78, § 5;

R.S.1943, (2004), § 57-1304;

Laws 2006, LB 1249, § 8.